California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(C) Provide quantifiable air quality benefits for the region in which the project is located.

(4) In addition to meeting the requirements of paragraph (3), the projects authorized pursuant to this section shall address a known forecast demand, as determined by the department or regional transportation agency.

(5) At least 60 days prior to executing a final lease agreement authorized pursuant to this section, the department or regional transportation agency shall submit the agreement to the Legislature and the Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission for review. Prior to submitting a lease agreement to the Legislature and the Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission, the department or regional
 transportation agency shall conduct at least one public hearing at a location at or near the proposed facility for purposes of receiving public comment on the lease agreement. Public comments made during this hearing shall be submitted to the Legislature and the Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission with the lease agreement. The Secretary of Transportation or the chairperson of the Senate or Assembly fiscal committees or policy committees with jurisdiction over transportation matters may, by written notification to the department or regional transportation agency, provide any comments about the proposed agreement within the 60-day period prior to the execution of the final agreement. The department or regional transportation agency shall consider those comments prior to executing a final agreement and shall retain the discretion for executing the final lease agreement.

(d) For the purpose of facilitating those projects, the agreements
 between the parties may include provisions for the lease of rights-of-way in, and airspace over or under, highways, public streets, rail, or related facilities for the granting of necessary easements, and for the issuance of permits or other authorizations to enable the construction of transportation projects. Facilities subject to an agreement under this section shall, at all times, be owned by the department or the regional transportation agency, as appropriate. For department projects, the commission shall certify the department’s determination of the useful life of the project in establishing the lease agreement terms. In consideration therefor, the agreement shall provide for complete reversion of the leased facility, together with the right to collect tolls and user fees, to the department or regional transportation agency, at the expiration of the lease at no charge to the department or regional transportation agency. At the time of the reversion, the facility shall be delivered to the department or
 regional transportation agency, as applicable, in a condition that meets the performance and maintenance standards established by the department or regional transportation agency and that is free of any encumbrance, lien, or other claims.

(e) Agreements between the department or regional transportation agency and the contracting entity or lessee shall authorize the contracting entity or lessee to use a design-build method of procurement for transportation projects, subject to the requirements for utilizing such a method contained in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 6800) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, other than Sections 6802, 6803, and 6813 of that code, if those provisions are enacted by the Legislature during the 2009–10 Regular Session, or a 2009–10 extraordinary session.

(f) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any
 other provision of this chapter, for projects on the state highway system, the department is the responsible agency for the performance of project development services, including performance specifications, preliminary engineering, prebid services, the preparation of project reports and environmental documents, and construction inspection services. The department is also the responsible agency for the preparation of documents that may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, and workmanship, preliminary plans, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the needs of the department or regional transportation agency.

(B) The department may use department employees or consultants to perform the services described in subparagraph (A), consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution.
 Department resources, including personnel requirements, necessary for the performance of those services shall be included in the department’s capital outlay support program for workload purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(2) The department or a regional transportation agency may exercise any power possessed by it with respect to transportation projects to facilitate the transportation projects pursuant to this section. The department, regional transportation agency, and other state or local agencies may provide services to the contracting entity or lessee for which the public entity is reimbursed, including, but not limited to, planning, environmental planning, environmental certification, environmental review, preliminary design, design, right-of-way acquisition, construction, maintenance, and policing of these transportation projects. The department or regional transportation agency, as applicable, shall regularly inspect the facility and
 require the contracting entity or lessee to maintain and operate the facility according to adopted standards. Except as may otherwise be set forth in the lease agreement, the contracting entity or lessee shall be responsible for all costs due to development, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, and reconstruction, and operating costs.

(g) (1) In selecting private entities with which to enter into these agreements, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department and regional transportation agencies may utilize, but are not limited to utilizing, one or more of the following procurement approaches:

(A) Solicitations of proposals for defined projects and calls for project proposals within defined parameters.

(B) Prequalification and short-listing of proposers prior to final evaluation of
 proposals.

(C) Final evaluation of proposals based on qualifications and best value. The California Transportation Commission shall develop and adopt criteria for making that evaluation prior to evaluation of a proposal.

(D) Negotiations with proposers prior to award.

(E) Acceptance of unsolicited proposals, with issuance of requests for competing proposals. Neither the department nor a regional transportation agency may award a contract to an unsolicited bidder without receiving at least one other responsible bid.

(2) When evaluating a proposal submitted by the contracting entity or lessee, the department or the regional transportation agency may award a contract on the basis of the lowest bid or best value.

(h) The contracting entity or lessee shall have the following qualifications:

(1) Evidence that the members of the contracting entity or lessee have completed, or have demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, a project of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the contracting entity or lessee has the capacity to complete the project.

(2) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(3) Evidence that establishes that members of the contracting entity or lessee have the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(4) Evidence that the contracting entity or lessee has workers’ compensation experience, history, and a worker safety program of members of the contracting entity or lessee that is acceptable to the department or regional transportation agency.

(5) A full disclosure regarding all of the following with respect to each member of the contracting entity or lessee during the past five years:

(A) Any serious or willful violation of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596).

(B) Any instance where members of the contracting entity or lessee were debarred, disqualified, or removed from a federal, state, or local government public works project.

(C) Any instance where members of the contracting entity or lessee, or its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works project and were found to be nonresponsive or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(D) Any instance where members of the contracting entity or lessee, or its owners, officers, or managing employees defaulted on a construction contract.

(E) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), including, but not limited to,
 alleged violations of federal or state law regarding the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or Federal Insurance Contributions Act (FICA) withholding requirements.

(F) Any bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the contracting entity or lessee, including, but not limited to, information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(G) Any settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the contracting entity or lessee during the five years preceding submission of a bid under this article, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this five-year period.

(H) If the
 contracting entity or lessee is a partnership, joint venture, or an association that is not a legal entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association that specifies that all general partners, joint venturers, or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the agreement.

(i) No agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall infringe on the authority of the department or a regional transportation agency to develop, maintain, repair, rehabilitate, operate, or lease any transportation project. Lease agreements may provide for reasonable compensation to the contracting entity or lessee for the adverse effects on toll revenue or user fee revenue due to the development, operation, or lease of supplemental transportation projects with the exception of any of the following:

(1) Projects identified in regional transportation plans
 prepared pursuant to Section 65080 of the Government Code.

(2) Safety projects.

(3) Improvement projects that will result in incidental capacity increases.

(4) Additional high-occupancy vehicle lanes or the conversion of existing lanes to high-occupancy vehicle lanes.

(5) Projects located outside the boundaries of a public-private partnership project, to be defined by the lease agreement.

However, compensation to a contracting entity or lessee shall only be made after a demonstrable reduction in use of the facility resulting in reduced toll or user fee revenues, and may not exceed the difference between the reduction in those revenues and the amount necessary to cover the costs of debt service, including
 principal and interest on any debt incurred for the development, operation, maintenance, or rehabilitation of the facility.

(j) (1) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall authorize the contracting entity or lessee to impose tolls and user fees for use of a facility constructed by it, and shall require that over the term of the lease the toll revenues and user fees be applied to payment of the capital outlay costs for the project, the costs associated with operations, toll and user fee collection, administration of the facility, reimbursement to the department or other governmental entity for the costs of services to develop and maintain the project, police services, and a reasonable return on investment. The agreement shall require that, notwithstanding Sections 164, 188, and 188.1, any excess toll or user fee revenue either be applied to any indebtedness incurred by the contracting entity or lessee with
 respect to the project, improvements to the project, or be paid into the State Highway Account, or for all three purposes, except that any excess toll revenue under a lease agreement with a regional transportation agency may be paid to the regional transportation agency for use in improving public transportation in and near the project boundaries.

(2) Lease agreements shall establish specific toll or user fee rates. Any proposed increase in those rates not otherwise established or identified in the lease agreement during the term of the agreement shall first be approved by the department or regional transportation agency, as appropriate, after at least one public hearing conducted at a location near the proposed or existing facility.

(3) The collection of tolls and user fees for the use of these facilities may be extended by the commission or regional transportation agency at the
 expiration of the lease agreement. However, those tolls or user fees shall not be used for any purpose other than for the improvement, continued operation, or maintenance of the facility.

(k) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall include indemnity, defense, and hold harmless provisions agreed to by the department or regional transportation agency and the contracting entity or lessee, including provisions for indemnifying the State of California or the regional transportation agency against any claims or losses resulting or accruing from the performance of the contracting entity or lessee.

(l) The plans and specifications for each transportation project on the state highway system developed, maintained, repaired, rehabilitated, reconstructed, or operated pursuant to this section shall comply with the department’s standards for state transportation projects. The
 lease agreement shall include performance standards, including, but not limited to, levels of service. The agreement shall require facilities on the state highway system to meet all requirements for noise mitigation, landscaping, pollution control, and safety that otherwise would apply if the department were designing, building, and operating the facility. If a facility is on the state highway system, the facility leased pursuant to this section shall, during the term of the lease, be deemed to be a part of the state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, enforcement of traffic laws, and for the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(m) Failure to comply with the lease agreement in any significant manner shall constitute a default under the agreement and the department or the regional transportation agency, as appropriate, shall have the option to initiate processes to
 revert the facility to the public agency.

(n) The assignment authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 130240 of the Public Utilities Code is consistent with this section.

(o) A lease to a private entity pursuant to this section is deemed to be public property for a public purpose and exempt from leasehold, real property, and ad valorem taxation, except for the use, if any, of that property for ancillary commercial purposes.

(p) Nothing in this section is intended to infringe on the authority to develop high-occupancy toll lanes pursuant to Section 149.4, 149.5, or 149.6.

(q) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow the conversion of any existing nontoll or nonuser-fee lanes into tolled or user fee lanes with the exception of a high-occupancy
 vehicle lane that may be operated as a high-occupancy toll lane for vehicles not otherwise meeting the requirements for use of that lane.

(r) The lease agreement shall require the contracting entity or lessee to provide any information or data requested by the California Transportation Commission or the Legislative Analyst. The commission, in cooperation with the Legislative Analyst, shall annually prepare a report on the progress of each project and ultimately on the operation of the resulting facility. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a review of the performance standards, a financial analysis, and any concerns or recommendations for changes in the program authorized by this section.

(s) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no lease agreement may be entered into pursuant to the section that affects, alters, or supersedes the Memorandum of
 Understanding (MOU), dated November 26, 2008, entered into by the Golden Gate Bridge Highway and Transportation District, the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, and the San Francisco County Transportation Authority, relating to the financing of the U.S. Highway 101/Doyle Drive reconstruction project located in the City and County of San Francisco.

(t) No lease agreements may be entered into under this section on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 9.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

143.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the demonstration toll road project known as State Highway Route 125 (SR 125) in the County of San Diego, authorized pursuant to authority granted to the department by Chapter 107 of the Statutes of 1989, as subsequently amended by Chapter 1115 of the Statutes of 1990 and Chapter 688 of the Statutes of 2002, shall be subject to tolls for a period of up to 45 years under the following additional terms and conditions:

(1) If agreed to
 by the private entity and the department, and subject to concurrence by the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG), the County of San Diego, the City of San Diego, and the City of Chula Vista, by January 2010, all of whom shall exercise their good faith efforts to reach that agreement and concurrence, the SR 125 franchise agreement shall be amended to provide for a lease period of up to 45 years, which shall be reflected in the SR 125 Development Franchise Agreement, dated January 30, 1991, as amended. If an amendment to extend the lease period is agreed to by the parties, the tolls collected during any extension period shall be used for one or more of the following purposes, as specified in the amendment to the agreement:

(A) By the private entity to reimburse it for project costs incurred on behalf of the department or SANDAG.

(B) By the private entity to compensate or
 reimburse it for project costs or other impacts for which it is entitled to compensation pursuant to the development franchise agreement or other agreements in effect as of June 30, 2006, with or between the private entity and SANDAG concerning SR 125.

(C) By the private entity to reimburse the department or SANDAG for project costs permitted under the development franchise agreement in effect as of June 30, 2006.

(D) By the private entity for one or more of the following purposes: the private entity’s capital outlay costs for the project; the costs associated with operations, toll collection, and administration of the facility; reimbursement of the state for the costs of maintenance and police services; or a reasonable return on investment to the private entity.

(E) The development franchise agreement or any
 amendment thereto shall require that any excess toll revenue either be applied to repayment of the indebtedness incurred by the private entity with respect to the project, or payment into the State Highway Account for the benefit of the San Diego region, or both.

(2) If an amendment to the SR 125 Development Franchise Agreement is not executed by January 31, 2010, or if an amendment to the agreement is executed by January 31, 2010, that extends the lease period for less than 10 additional years, the department and SANDAG may agree, subject to concurrence by the County of San Diego, the City of San Diego, and the City of Chula Vista, to operate and maintain the toll road for any remaining period of time up to a maximum of 10 years following expiration of the agreement. Tolls collected by the department or SANDAG shall be used to reimburse the department or SANDAG, as applicable, for the SR 125 project costs permitted under the development
 franchise agreement in effect as of June 30, 2006.

(3) Except as specifically amended consistent with this section, the SR 125 Development Franchise Agreement shall remain in full force and effect as set forth therein, and this section shall not be deemed to modify any rights or obligations of the parties thereto.

(b) SANDAG may operate the SR 125 facility and continue the collection of tolls upon the expiration of the SR 125 Development Franchise Agreement or the up to 10-year period specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), as applicable, subject to a 23 vote of the SANDAG board, pursuant to a plan that specifies the expenditure of toll revenues for projects within the SR 125 corridor. The operation and toll collection may be done in cooperation with the department or solely
 by SANDAG, with toll revenues to be available for the costs associated with operations, toll collection, and administration of the facility, and reimbursement of the state for the costs of maintenance and police services. Projects eligible for funding from excess toll revenues shall be limited to projects that improve the operation of SR 125, including highway and street projects, truck-only lanes, and transit services and facilities. Any changes to the plan shall require a 23 vote of the SANDAG board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 446, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

143.2.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Authorized agreement” means either of the following types of agreements:

(A) An agreement whereby the rail entity assists the department in defining a feasible project and negotiates fair and reasonable terms for implementing the project.

(B) An agreement whereby the rail entity assumes responsibility for designing, procuring, delivering, improving, or constructing an eligible facility in accordance with established specifications and payment terms.

(2) “Eligible facility” means
 any wildlife crossing and appurtenance thereto developed, operated, or held in accordance with this section, and includes the wildlife crossings and appurtenances described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) “Quantifiable environmental benefits” means documented, ongoing, positive, and quantifiable benefits to the environment and environmental quality, including to wildlife.

(4) “Rail entity” means a person, entity, or organization that is not the federal government or any other public agency and that is undertaking an intercity passenger rail construction project within the Interstate 15 right-of-way.

(5) “State-Rail agreement” means the “Agreement to Implement Wildlife Overcrossings Over Interstate 15” executed on January 11, 2023, by and among DesertXpress Enterprises, LLC, the department, and the Department
 of Fish and Wildlife.

(b) (1) If an intercity passenger rail project is constructed within the segment of the Interstate 15 right-of-way at the segment described in Recital B of the State-Rail agreement, the department shall ensure the construction of three wildlife crossings and appurtenances at three priority locations.

(2) The department may use an authorized agreement to comply with paragraph (1).

(3) The department shall consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife and with entities with expertise in the development, design, and construction of wildlife crossing structures as part of the development, design, and construction of the three wildlife crossing structures described in paragraph (1).

(4) After construction, the
 department shall own the wildlife overcrossings, and the department, in consultation with, and the support of, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall maintain and operate the wildlife overcrossings, including the maintenance of habitat, consistent with Section 2.2.6 and 2.3.6 of the State-Rail agreement.

(5) The department may enter into an agreement, which shall provide permanent funding as necessary, for the purpose of maintaining habitat on an eligible facility.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, but subject to this section, the department may solicit proposals for, accept unsolicited proposals for, negotiate, or enter into, an authorized agreement with a rail entity to develop and construct concurrently with the rail entity’s project an eligible facility that is described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) The department may enter into an authorized agreement for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) if the authorized agreement will provide quantifiable environmental benefits for the region and for wildlife and if the department deems the authorized agreement to be in the best interest of the state.

(e) (1) The department may include in an authorized agreement to develop, design, and construct an eligible facility for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), any provision the department determines necessary or appropriate, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Provisions addressing how the department and rail entity will share development costs and allocate and manage project risks.

(B) Provisions allowing the department to grant or otherwise disburse state
 or federal funds to the rail entity for the costs to develop and construct an eligible facility, excluding any costs associated with the design of an eligible facility.

(C) Provisions addressing the acquisition of rights-of-way and other property interests that may be required, including for the granting of necessary easements and for the issuance of permits or other authorizations.

(D) Provisions identifying any technical specifications concerning the eligible facility that must be satisfied by the rail entity.

(E) Provisions specifying events of default, remedies available to the rail entity and department, and dispute resolution procedures, including arbitration and other alternative dispute resolution procedures.

(F) Provisions regarding the
 maintenance and auditing of the rail entity’s books and records.

(G) Provisions specifying that the rail entity will comply with all applicable legal requirements related to the use of state or federal funds.

(H) Provisions specifying that the rail entity will obtain errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(I) Provisions specifying that the rail entity will require payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance of its contractors and consultants.

(2) An authorized agreement shall include indemnity, defense, and hold harmless provisions agreed to by the department and the rail entity, including provisions for indemnifying the State of California from any claims or losses
 resulting or accruing from the performance of the rail entity.

(f) (1) The department may use any lawful source of funding or financing, either previously appropriated or upon appropriation, for the development or construction of an eligible facility under this section, including funding described in paragraph (2).

(2) The department may accept from the United States or any of its agencies any funds or credit assistance as are available to it for carrying out the purposes of this section, whether the funds are made available by grant, loan, or other financing arrangement.

(g) The department shall apply for a competitive grant from federal grant programs to fund activities associated with construction of the wildlife crossing structures described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(h) (1) Before executing an authorized agreement pursuant to this section, the department shall submit a draft of the agreement to the Department of Finance for review.

(2) An authorized agreement may only be executed under this section before January 1, 2025.

(3) If the department has not executed an authorized agreement pursuant to this section on or before July 1, 2024, the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and submit a progress report on entering into an authorized agreement to the budget committees of the Legislature.

(i) The department shall exercise the authority under this section in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(j) Nothing in this section affects, expands, alters, or limits any other rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(k) On or before January 1, 2024, and at least annually thereafter, the department shall submit a written status report to the relevant policy committee and budget committee of the Legislature on the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 8.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

144.

The department is authorized to divide or separate any state highway into separate roadways, wherever there is particular danger to the traveling public of collision between vehicles proceeding in opposite directions or from cross traffic, by constructing curbs, central dividing sections, or other physical separations, or by signs, marks, or other devices, in or on the roadway appropriate to designate the dividing line.

The rules governing operation of vehicles on divided highways are contained in Section 21651 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

144.5.

No state highway shall be divided as provided in Section 144 in such manner as to prevent traffic on any city street or county highway which such state highway intersects from crossing such state highway until after thirty (30) days’ notice thereof has been given by the department to the city council or board of supervisors having jurisdiction over the street or highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1211.)
-------------------------------------------

145.

The department is authorized to lay out and construct local service roads on and along any state highway where there is particular danger to the traveling public of collision due to vehicles entering the highway from the side thereof and to divide and separate any service road from the main thoroughfare by raised curbs or dividing sections or by other appropriate devices.

It is unlawful for any person to drive any vehicle into the main thoroughfare from any service road except through an opening in the dividing curb or dividing section or dividing line.

Any person who
 violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

146.

Any public agency having responsibility for the planning and development within a region of this state of public transportation systems may, with the approval of the commission, use the airspace over or under any existing state freeway in that region, or any portion other than the travel roadway of the right-of-way of such freeway, as a route for a public transportation system, such as a railway, monorail, tracked air cushion vehicle system or other such system which, in the discretion of the agency and the department, is feasible from an engineering standpoint, in conformity with established safety design standards, and is consistent with good ecological and environmental
 planning. The development and construction of such facilities shall be financed out of any available federal, state, and local funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 530.)
-------------------------------------------

146.5.

(a) The department may construct, maintain, and operate fringe and transportation corridor parking facilities along the state highway system when those facilities would reduce motor vehicle traffic congestion or improve highway safety. Those facilities may include child care projects that are part of an overall traffic reduction plan. For purposes of this code, those facilities are part of the state highway, and the department shall acquire the right-of-way necessary for those facilities in accordance with all of the laws and procedures applicable to other state highway projects. 

(b) The department may enter into agreements with other public agencies for the joint financing of fringe and transportation corridor parking facilities. The rights and obligations of the department and other public agencies with respect to those facilities shall be determined by agreement. 

(c) Fringe and transportation corridor parking facilities estimated to cost two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more and located in an urbanized area shall be limited to those facilities included by transportation planning agencies in a regional transportation improvement program prepared pursuant to Section 14527 of the Government Code. Not more than two million dollars ($2,000,000) of the state funds appropriated by the Legislature each year for state highway construction may be used for the purpose of constructing those facilities. In addition, for projects estimated to cost
 thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more, the state funds may be used only to match federal or local funds, or both. 

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow the department to make available space in underutilized park and ride lots for child care purposes when linked to an overall traffic reduction plan. It is not the intent of the Legislature for the department to enter into the operation of those child care projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 11.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

147.

The director shall, without supplanting any other program required to be administered by the department or redirecting funds allocated to other programs, restart program efforts in District 7 of the department to develop and implement additional shared use agreements for public use of private parking lots as park and ride facilities. These shared use agreements shall be developed and implemented to complement and facilitate ridership on existing and planned transit routes in District 7, including, but not limited to, the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation
 Authority’s Metro Rapid Bus route along Ventura Boulevard and the proposed East-West Busway in the San Fernando Valley, for the purpose of reducing congestion on state highways. The department shall not enter into any shared use agreement that would result in costs to the department over the life of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

148.

The department may construct and maintain transit related highway facilities along the state highway system. Those facilities may include, but are not limited to, bus turn-outs, passenger loading areas, passenger benches and shelters, and special traffic control devices. For purposes of this code, those facilities are part of the state highway.

Facilities estimated to cost two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more and located in an urbanized area shall be limited to those facilities included by transportation planning agencies in a regional transportation improvement program prepared pursuant to Section
 14527 of the Government Code. Not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the state funds appropriated by the Legislature each year for state highway construction may be used for the purpose of constructing those facilities. In addition, for projects estimated to cost thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or more, the state funds may be used only to match federal or local funds, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 95, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

148.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Monterey-Salinas Transit District and the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District may conduct a transit bus-only program using the shoulders of certain highways in the state highway system within the areas served by the transit services of the districts, with the approval of the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and participating transit districts shall jointly determine the segments of each highway where it is appropriate to designate the shoulders as transit bus-only traffic corridors, based upon factors that shall include, but not be limited to, right-of-way
 availability and capacity, peak congestion hours, and the most heavily congested areas. Under the program, the participating transit districts shall actively work with the department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol to develop guidelines that ensure driver and vehicle safety and the integrity of the infrastructure.

(b) The development of the guidelines shall be done with transparency, including the opportunity for public comment.

(c) The department and the participating transit districts shall monitor the state of repair of highway shoulders used in the program,
 including repairs attributable to the operation of transit buses on the shoulders.

(d) The participating transit districts shall be responsible for all costs attributable to this program, including costs related to repairs attributable to the operation of transit buses on shoulders.

(e) The program may commence operation as soon as guidelines are agreed to by the transit districts, the department, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol. 

(f) As used in
 this section, “highway” includes “freeway.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 426, Sec. 1.   (AB 946)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

149.

The department may construct exclusive or preferential lanes for buses only or for buses and other high-occupancy vehicles, and may authorize or permit such exclusive or preferential use of designated lanes on existing highways that are part of the State Highway System. Prior to constructing such lanes, the department shall conduct competent engineering estimates of the effect of such lanes on safety, congestion, and highway capacity.

To the extent they are available, the department may apply for and use federal aid funds appropriated for the design, construction, and use of such exclusive or preferential lanes, but may also use other
 State Highway Account funds, including other federal aid funds, for those purposes where proper and desirable.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the Carrell Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

149.1.
